Hawaii, session 2026, GM1133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. This Act is recommended by the governor for
immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of
the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.
PART II
SECTION 2. The legislature finds that the appropriation of
moneys for collective bargaining cost items associated with
labor grievances is necessary to support the fair and timely
resolution of employment disputes, maintain labor stability, and
ensure the continued effective operation of government services.
The legislature further finds that funding of these cost items
is in the public interest and necessary to carry out the State's
obligations under applicable collective bargaining agreements.
The legislature additionally finds that the State may be subject
to potential liabilities arising from labor grievances and that,
in certain circumstances, it is prudent to appropriate funds in
2026-3438 HB2271 CDl HMSO
IHlIIIMIIIIIIillH

Page 2 H.B. NO. g’a
C.D. 1
anticipation of the resolution of such grievances. The
legislature also finds that such appropriations must not be
construed as establishing liability, resolving disputes, or
infringing upon the authority of the executive branch to
negotiate, settle, or otherwise resolve labor grievances.
Further, the legislature finds that the university of
Hawaii and certain departments, have used their existing fiscal
year 2025-2026 budget to pay collective bargaining cost items
related to temporary hazard pay in fiscal year 2025-2026. This
action caused a reduction in funds available for departmental
operations for the balance of fiscal year 2025-2026.
To address the anticipated departmental funding shortfalls
due to the temporary hazard pay payouts, a short-term general
fund loan will be deposited into a department of budget and
finance trust account. The departments must reclassify the
collective bargaining cost items related to temporary hazard pay
expenditures from their fiscal year 2025-2026 operating general
fund appropriations to the trust account, thereby freeing the
appropriations in those operating budget accounts. Upon
enactment of this Act and the transfer of appropriated funds to
the departments, the departments must reverse the
2026-3438 HB2271 GDI HMSO
■liiiiimiinm

Page 3 H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
reclassifications so that the expenditures are restored to their
original operating budget accounts, making the trust account
whole.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Make emergency appropriations for collective
bargaining cost items for the members of bargaining
units (1) and (10) and their excluded counterparts to
resolve issues related to temporary hazard pay for
fiscal year 2025-2026;
(2) Authorize the use of the general fund appropriations
made in this Act to restore the temporary
reclassifications for temporary hazard pay payouts to
the appropriate departments to provide for the
repayment of the general fund loan; and
(3) Specify that emergency appropriations made under Act
29, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, do not lapse until
June 30, 2027.
PART III
SECTION 3. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following suras or so rauch thereof as may
2026-3438 HB2271 GDI HMSO
iiiiiiiilinniniiiiiiiii

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to fund collective
bargaining cost items associated with grievances filed under
agreements negotiated with the exclusive representative of
collective bargaining units (1) and (10) , and for their excluded
counterparts:
FY 2025-2026
General funds $66,795,019
Interdepartmental transfers $306,532’
Revolving funds $203,736
The sums appropriated shall be allotted by the director of
finance to the appropriate state departments for expenditure by
the appropriate state departments for the purposes of this
section; provided that:
(1) The appropriate state department may encumber funds
appropriated pursuant to this section for the purpose
of satisfying a potential obligation arising from the
labor grievance; provided that any such encumbrance
shall not constitute an obligation or expenditure of
funds; and
(2) The department may record an obligation in accordance
with applicable accounting and fiscal procedures.
2026-3438 HB2271 GDI HMSO

Page 5 2271
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
subject to allotment and release by the director of
finance.
SECTION 4. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to fund collective
bargaining cost items associated with grievances filed under
agreements negotiated with the exclusive representative of
collective bargaining units (1) and (10), and for their excluded
counterparts, including anticipated settlement agreements,
arbitration awards or orders, or court orders for the department
of education related to temporary hazard pay:
FY 2025-2026
General funds $28,468,723
Revolving funds $1,299
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of education for the purposes of this section; provided that;
(1) No funds shall be expended unless and until a legally
binding obligation to pay has been incurred by the
State, as evidenced by a fully executed settlement
agreement, duly authorized by the State, arbitration
2026-3438 HB2271 GDI HMSO 5

Page 6
H.B. NO.
S,D. 1
C.D, 1
award or order, or court order. Any settlement
agreement described in this paragraph shall be
approved in a form prescribed by the department of the
attorney general, and shall be executed in accordance
with applicable laws;
(2) The director of finance shall allot and release funds
appropriated under this section only upon written
notification by the department of education that the
conditions set forth in paragraph (1) have been
satisfied;
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
supersede or impair the authority of the executive
branch, including the authority to negotiate, settle,
or otherwise resolve labor grievances, or to determine
whether and on what terms to enter into any settlement
agreement; and
(4) The department of education may encumber funds
appropriated pursuant to this section for the purpose
of satisfying a potential obligation arising from the
labor grievance; provided that:
2026-3438 HB2271 CDl HMSO
iwiMiiiiiiniiiiniB

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(A) Any such encumbrance shall not constitute an
obligation or expenditure of funds; and
(B) Upon the occurrence of the condition under
paragraph (1), the department of education may
record an obligation in accordance with
applicable accounting and fiscal procedures,
subject to allotment and release by the director
of finance.
PART IV
SECTION 5. Funds appropriated or authorized by section 3
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in fiscal year 2025-2026 for
the purposes of this Act, including the repayment of general
fund loans by the general fund appropriations made in this Act,
which shall be deemed to be an authorized expenditure under the
general fund appropriations made in this Act.
SECTION 6. Neither this Act nor the appropriations made in
this Act shall be construed as an admission of liability in any
arbitration, administrative proceeding, or court, nor as a
legislative determination of the merits of any grievance or
related litigation, nor as authority for the legislature to
2026-3438 HB2271 CDl HMSO
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiHiiini

Page 8
H.B. NO. ??
o.LJ. I
C.D. 1
resolve, settle, or adjudicate any grievance or related
litigation.
PART V
SECTION 7. Act 29, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is amended
by amending section 11 to read as follows:
"SECTION 11. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act
that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, shall not
lapse as of that date[—]; provided that any such unexpended or
unencumbered funds shall remain available for expenditure until
June 30, 2027."
PART VI
SECTION 8. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided
in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is
paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds
shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be,
from the respective funds; provided that if the respective funds
are unable to support such payments, appropriations from other
means of financing may be used with the approval of the
governor.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any provision of this Act, with
the approval of the governor, the director of finance may
2026-3438 HB2271 CDl HMSO

Page 9
H.B. NO
2271
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
transfer unrequired balances from the appropriated funds as may
be available between sections 3 and 4 of this Act as necessary.
SECTION 10. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act
that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, shall not
lapse as of that date; provided that any such unexpended or
unencumbered funds shall remain available for expenditure until
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 11. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 12. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3438 HB2271 CDl HMSO 9

H.B. NO. 2271
±
W
O
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 26th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2271, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L, Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2271, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
147-26